th: รวมอุปกรณ์จัดแต่งทรงผม: กิ๊บหนีบผมตัวใหญ่; กิ๊บเสียบผม; หัวเป่าคอนเซนเทรเตอร์; เครื่องลอนผม; ซองใส่เครื่องลอนผม; แกนม้วนผม; หัวไดร์กระจายลม; ยางรัดผม; แปรงผม; กิ๊บหนีบผม; หวีสับ; โดนัทมัดผม; โรลม้วนผม; สายรัดผูกผม; ถุงมือทนความร้อน; แปรงลมร้อน; มัลติสไตเลอร์; แผ่นทำลอนธรรมชาติ; กิ๊บหนีบแบ่งผม; แปรงยืดผม; แปรงม้วนยืดผม; ที่หนีบยืดผม; ที่หนีบจัดแต่งพื้นผิว; อื่นๆ
fi: Mukana hiusten muotoilutuotteet: Hiussoljet; Pinnit; Keskittimen suutin; Kiharrin; Kihartimen päällinen; Kiharrinsauvat; Diffuusorikiinnike; Hiuslenkit; Hiusharja; Hiusklipsit; Hiuskampa; Hiusdonitsi; Hiusrulla; Hiusnauha; Lämmönkestävät käsineet; Kuumailmaharja; Monikäyttöiset muotoilulaitteet; Luonnonkiharrin; Jaotteluklipsit; Suoristusharja; Suoristavat kiharrusharjat; Suoristusrauta; Muotoiluraudat; Muu
es: Artículos de peluquería incluidos: Pasadores para el cabello; Horquillas; Boquilla concentradora; Plancha rizadora; Funda de plancha rizadora; Rizadora; Accesorio difusor; Bandas para el cabello; Cepillo para el cabello; Pinzas para el cabello; Peine para el cabello; Rosquilla para el cabello; Rodillo de pelo; Cintas para el cabello; Guantes resistentes al calor; Cepillo de aire caliente; Herramienta multiestilo; Placa de ondas naturales; Pinzas de peluquería; Cepillo alisador; Cepillo alisador y rizador; Plancha alisadora; Plancha texturizadora; Otros
cs: Obsažené položky pro vlasový styling: Spony do vlasů; Sponky do vlasů; Koncentrační tryska; Kulma; Kryt na kulmu; Kulmová hůlka; Nástavec na difuzér; Gumičky do vlasů; Kartáč na vlasy; Sponky do vlasů; Hřeben; Kobliha do vlasů; Vlasový váleček; Gumičky do vlasů; Tepelně odolné rukavice; Horkovzdušný kartáč; Kulmofén; Žehlička na přirozený vzhled vlasů; Dělicí klipy; Rozčesávací hřeben; Vyrovnávací kulmovací kartáč; Žehlička na rovnání vlasů; Texturizační žehlička; Jiné
nl: Haarstyling inbegrepen: Baretten; Haarspelden; Blaasmond; Krultang; Krultang hoes; Krulstaaf; Diffusorbevestiging; Haarbanden; Haarborstel; Haarspelden; Haarkam; Haar donut; Haarroller; Haar elastiekjes; Hittebestendige handschoenen; Heteluchtborstel; Multistyler; Natuurlijke golfplaat; Sectieclips; Stijlborstels; Stijlkrulborstel; Stijltang; Texturisatietang; Andere
lt-LT: Į komplektą įtraukti plaukų formavimo įrankiai: Segtukai; Smeigtukai; Koncentratoriaus antgalis; Garbanojimo žnyplės; Garbanojimo žnyplių dėklas; Plaukų sukimo žnyplės; Difuzoriaus antgalis; Plaukų lankeliai; Plaukų šepetys; Plaukų segtukai; Plaukų šukos; Plaukų spurga; Plaukų suktukai; Plaukų gumytės; Karščiui atsparios pirštinės; Karšto oro šepetys; Universalus plaukų formavimo įrankis; Natūralios plaukų bangavimo plokštelės; Plaukų atskyrimo segtukai; Tiesinimo šepetys; Tiesinimo ir garbanojimo šepetys; Tiesinimo žnyplės; Apimties suteikiančios žnyplės; Kita
nb: Hårstylingartikler inkludert: Barretter; Fliseklemmer; Konsentratordyse; Krølltang; Krølltangdeksel; Krøllstav; Diffuserfeste; Hårbånd; Hårbørste; Hårspenner; Hårkam; Hårsmultring; Hårrulle; Hårstrikker; Varmeresistente hansker; Varmluftsbørste; Multistyler-verktøy; Plate for naturlige bølger; Seksjoneringsklemmer; Rettebørste; Rette-/krøllbørste; Rettetang; Teksturtang; Annet
el: Περιλαμβάνονται είδη styling μαλλιών: Μπαρέτες; Κοκαλάκια; Ακροφύσιο συμπυκνωτή; Σίδερο για μπούκλες; Κάλυμμα σίδερου για μπούκλες; Ράβδος για μπούκλες; Προσάρτημα διαχυτήρα; Κορδέλες μαλλιών; Βούρτσα μαλλιών; Κλιπ μαλλιών; Χτένα μαλλιών; Λαστιχάκι για τα μαλλιά; Ρολό μαλλιών; Δεματικά μαλλιών; Γάντια ανθεκτικά στη θερμότητα; Βούρτσα ζεστού αέρα; Multistyler; Πλάκα φυσικού κύματος; Τσιμπιδάκια; Βούρτσα ισιώματος; Βούρτσα ισιώματος για μπούκλες; Σίδερο ισιώματος; Σίδερο υφής; Άλλο
sv: Hårstylingartiklar som ingår: Hårspännen; Hårnålar; Koncentratormunstycke; Locktång; Locktångsskydd; Locktång; Diffusorfäste; Hårband; Hårborste; Hårklämmor; Hårkam; Hårmunk; Hårrulle; Hårsnoddar; Värmebeständiga handskar; Varmluftsborste; Multistyler; Naturlig vågplatta; Sektioneringsklämmor; Plattborste; Uträtande curlingborste; Plattång; Texturerande tång; Övrigt
ja: ヘアスタイリングアイテム付き: バレッタ; ヘアピン; コンセントレーターノズル; ヘアアイロン; ヘアアイロンカバー; カールワンド; ディフューザーアタッチメント; ヘアバンド; ヘアブラシ; ヘアクリップ; コーム; ヘアドーナツ; ヘアローラー; ヘアゴム; 耐熱手袋; ホットエアーブラシ; マルチスタイラー; ナチュラルウェーブ プレート; セクションクリップ; ストレートニングブラシ; ストレートニング カーリング ブラシ; ストレートアイロン; テクスチャライジングアイロン; その他
sk-SK: Produkty na úpravu vlasov zahrnuté v cene: Barrety; Sponky Bobby; Tryska koncentrátora; Kulma; Kryt na kulmu; Kulma; Nástavec na difúzor; Gumičky do vlasov; Kefa na vlasy; Sponky do vlasov; Hrebeň na vlasy; Donut do vlasov; Valček na vlasy; Sponky do vlasov; Teplovzdorné rukavice; Teplovzdušná kefa; Multistyler; Kulma na prirodzené vlny; Rozdeľovacie sponky; Vyrovnávacia kefa; Kefa na kulmu; Žehlička na vyrovnávanie; Texturizačná žehlička; Iné
it: Articoli per acconciature inclusi: Mollette per capelli; Forcine; Ugello concentratore; Ferro arricciacapelli; Copertura per ferro arricciacapelli; Bacchetta arricciacapelli; Attacco diffusore; Fasce per capelli; Spazzola per capelli; Forcine per capelli; Pettinini per capelli; Ciambella per capelli; Rullo per capelli; Elastici per capelli; Guanti resistenti al calore; Spazzola ad aria calda; Multistile; Piastra per onde naturali; Clip di sezionamento; Spazzola lisciante; Spazzola lisciante per arricciare; Ferro lisciante; Ferro texturizzante; Altro
ro-RO: Articole de coafat incluse: Clame; Agrafe; Duză concentrator; Ondulator; Capac pentru ondulator; Baghetă de ondulat părul; Accesoriu difuzor; Bentițe; Perie de păr; Agrafe de păr; Pieptene de păr; Burete pentru păr; Bigudiu; Elastice de păr; Mănuși rezistente la căldură; Perie cu aer cald; Instrument de coafare versatil; Placă pentru onduleuri naturale; Cleme de împărțire în secțiuni; Perie de îndreptat părul; Perie de îndreptat și ondulator; Placă de îndreptat părul; Placă pentru textură; Altele
zh-CN: 包含美发用品: 条状发夹; 一字发夹; 集风嘴; 电卷棒; 电卷棒盖; 卷发棒; 扩散器附件; 发带; 梳子; 发夹; 插梳/发插; 发圈; 卷发筒; 扎头绳; 耐热手套; 热风刷; 多造型工具; 自然波浪夹板; 定位夹; 直发刷; 直发/卷发刷; 直发器; 纹理卷发器; 其他
pl: Elementy do stylizacji włosów w zestawie: Spinki; Wsówki; Dysza koncentratora; Lokówka do włosów; Pokrowiec na lokówkę; Kijek do loków; Mocowanie dyfuzora; Opaski do włosów; Szczotka do włosów; Klipsy do włosów; Grzebień do włosów; Opaska do koka; Wałek do włosów; Gumki do włosów; Rękawice odporne na wysokie temperatury; Szczotka na gorące powietrze; Urządzenie do stylizacji włosów z wymiennym końcówkami; Falownica do włosów; Klipsy do sekcjonowania; Szczotka prostująca; Szczotka do prostowania loków; Prostownica; Żelazko teksturujące; Inne
sl-SI: Priloženi izdelki za oblikovanje las: lasna sponka barrette; Lasnice; Koncentratorska šoba; Kodralnik; Prevleka za kodralnik; Palica za kodranje; Nastavek za difuzor; Trakovi za lase; Krtača za lase; Sponke za lase; Glavnik za lase; Penica za spenjanje las; Navijalka; Elastike za lase; Toplotno odporne rokavice; Krtača z vročim zrakom; Večnamesnki pripomoček za stiliranje; Naravna valovita plošča; Sponke za razdeljevanje; Krtača za ravnanje; Krtača za ravnanje in kodranje; Likalnik za ravnanje las; Likalnik za teksturiranje; Drugo
fr: Articles de coiffure inclus: Barrettes; Épingles à cheveux; Buse de concentrateur; Fer à friser; Housse pour fer à friser; Baguette à friser; Fixation du diffuseur; Chouchous; Brosse à cheveux; Pinces à cheveux; Peigne; Beignet pour cheveux; Rouleau à cheveux; Élastiques à cheveux; Gants résistants à la chaleur; Brosse à air chaud; Multistyleur; Plaque à ondulations naturelles; Clips de sectionnement; Brosse lissante; Brosse à friser lissante; Fer à lisser; Fer texturisant; Autre
pt-BR: Itens de penteado incluídos: Presilhas; Grampos; Bocal concentrador; Chapinha; Capa para modelador de cachos; Modelador de cachos; Acessório difusor; Faixas de cabelo; Escova de cabelo; Grampos de cabelo; Pente de cabelo; Rosquinha de cabelo; Bobe; Laço de cabelo; Luvas resistentes ao calor; Escova de ar quente; Escova secadora 5 em 1; Chapinha para ondas naturais; Clipes separadores; Escova alisadora; Escovas alisadora de cachos; Ferro de alisamento; Ferro texturizante; Outro
en: Hair styling items included: Barrettes; Bobby pins; Concentrator nozzle; Curling iron; Curling iron cover; Curling wand; Diffuser attachment; Hair bands; Hair brush; Hair clips; Hair comb; Hair donut; Hair roller; Hair ties; Heat resistant gloves; Hot air brush; Multistyler; Natural wave plate; Sectioning clips; Straightening brush; Straightening curling brush; Straightening iron; Texturizing iron; Other
zh-TW: 包括美髮用品: 小髮夾; 髮夾; 集中噴嘴; 捲髮棒; 捲髮棒罩; 手持捲髮棒; 熱烘罩附件; 髮圈; 梳子; 髮夾; 梳子; 甜甜圈髮髻; 髮捲; 髮帶; 耐熱手套; 熱風梳; 髮型造型器; 天然波浪美髮夾; 分區定位夾; 直髮梳; 直捲髮梳; 離子燙夾; 美髮造型器; 其他
da: Hårstylingsartikler medfølger: Baretter; Bobby-stifter; Koncentratordyse; Krøllejern; Krøllejernscover; Krøllestav; Diffuser-ekstraudstyr; Hårbånd; Hårbørste; Hårspænder; Hårkam; Hårdonut; Hårruller; Hårelastikker; Varmeresistente handsker; Varmluftsbørste; Multistyler; Naturlig bølgeplade; Opdelingsklips; Udglatningsbørste; Udglatningskrøllebørste; Glattejern; Teksturerende jern; Andet
ko: 헤어 스타일링 아이템 포함: 바레트; 바비 핀; 집중 노즐; 고데기; 고데기 커버; 컬링 봉; 디퓨저 부착물; 헤어 밴드; 헤어 브러시; 헤어 클립; 머리빗; 헤어 도넛; 헤어 롤러; 머리끈; 내열 장갑; 핫에어 브러시; 멀티스타일링 도구; 내추럴 웨이브 플레이트; 헤어 클립; 스트레이트닝 브러쉬; 스트레이트닝 컬링 브러쉬; 스트레이트 고데기; 텍스처 고데기; 기타
bg-BG: Включени продукти за оформяне на косата: Шноли; Фиби; Концентраторна дюза; Маша за къдрене; Капак за маша за къдрене; Пръчка за къдрене; Приставка за дифузьор; Ленти за коса; Четка за коса; Щипки за коса; Гребен за коса; Поничка за коса; Ролка за коса; Връзки за коса; Топлоустойчиви ръкавици; Четка за горещ въздух; Мултистайлер; Плоча с естествена вълна; Щипки за разделяне; Четка за изправяне; Четка за изправяне на къдрици; Преса за изправяне; Преса за текстуриране; Други
vi: Đi kèm sản phẩm tạo kiểu tóc: Kẹp tóc; Kẹp tăm; Vòi tập trung; Máy uốn tóc cầm tay; Nắp máy uốn tóc cầm tay; Máy uốn tóc; Phụ kiện khuếch tán; Dây buộc tóc; Lược chải tóc; Kẹp tóc; Lược chải tóc; Búi tóc; Lô cuốn tóc; Dây cột tóc; Găng tay chịu nhiệt; Lược chải khí nóng; Máy tạo kiểu đa năng; Máy uốn tạo sóng tự nhiên; Kẹp giữ tóc; Lược chải tóc thẳng; Lược chải thẳng tóc; Máy ép tóc; Kẹp uốn tạo tầng; Khác
tr: Saç şekillendirme ürünleri dahil: Tokalar; Tel toka; Yoğunlaştırıcı başlık; Saç maşası; Saç maşası kapağı; Kıvırma çubuğu; Difüzör eki; Saç Bantları; Saç fırçası; Saç tokası; Tarak; Topuz; Saç rulosu; Saç bağları; Isıya dayanıklı eldivenler; Sıcak hava fırçası; Çoklu Şekillendirici; Doğal dalga plakası; Bölümleme klipleri; Düzleştirme fırçası; Düzleştirici kıvırma fırçası; Düzleştirici maşa; Tekstüre maşası; Diğer
de: Haarstyling-Artikel inklusive: Haarspangen; Haarnadeln; Profidüse; Lockenstab; Lockenstab-Cover; Lockenstab; Diffusor-Aufsatz; Haarbänder; Haarbürste; Haarclips; Kamm; Haar-Donut; Lockenwickler; Haargummis; Hitzebeständige Handschuhe; Warmluftbürste; Multistyler; Natürlicher Wellenaufsatz; Trennclips; Glättungsbürste; Glättende Lockenbürste; Glätteisen; Texturierendes Eisen; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Uključeni artikli za oblikovanje kose: Kopčice; Ukosnice; Nastavak za feniranje; Pegla za kovrčanje kose; Navlaka za peglu za kovrčanje kose; Štapić za kovrčanje kose; Difuzor; Trake za kosu; Četka za kosu; Kopče za kosu; Češalj za kosu; Umetak za punđu; Valjak za kosu; Gumice za kosu; Rukavice otporne na toplinu; Četka na vrući zrak; Multistyler; Pločica za prirodnu valovitu kosu; Kopče za razdvajanje kose; Četka za ravnanje; Četka za ravnanje i uvijanje; Pegla za ravnanje; Pegla za teksturiranje; Ostalo
ru: Состав набора для укладки волос: Заколки; Невидимки; Насадка-концентратор; Плойка; Чехол для щипцов для завивки; Щипцы для завивки; Насадка-диффузор; Резинки для волос; Щетка для волос; Заколки для волос; Гребень для волос; Бублик для волос; Бигуди; Резинки для волос; Термостойкие перчатки; Фен-щетка; Мультистайлер; Пластина для естественной волны; Зажимы; Выпрямляющая щетка; Выпрямляющая щетка для завивки; Выпрямляющий утюжок; Текстурирующий утюжок; Другое
hu: A tartalmazott hajformázó cikkek: Hajcsatok; Hajtűk; Szűkítőfej; Hajsütővas; Hajsütővas-huzat; Hajcsavaró; Diffúzor tartozék; Hajpántok; Hajkefe; Hajcsipeszek; Hajfésű; Hajfánk; Hajgöndörítő; Hajszalagok; Hőálló kesztyű; Forrólevegős kefe; Multistyler; Hullámosító lap; Elválasztó csatok; Egyenesítő kefe; Egyenesítő göndörítő kefe; Egyenesítő sütővas; Textúrázó sütővas; Egyéb
pt-PT: Itens de penteado incluídos: Ganchos; Ganchos simples; Bocal concentrador; Ferro de enrolar o cabelo; Tampa de ferro de enrolar o cabelo; Modelador de cabelo; Acessório difusor; Fitas para o cabelo; Escova de cabelo; Grampos de cabelo; Pente para o cabelo; Donut para o cabelo; Rolo de cabelo; Elásticos de cabelo; Luvas resistente ao calor; Escova de ar quente; Multistyler; Placa de ondas naturais; Clipes de seccionamento; Escova de alisamento; Escova para enrolar e alisar o cabelo; Ferro de alisamento do cabelo; Ferros para texturizar; Outro